Massachusetts, session 194th, H3103.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
Section 6(e) of chapter 62 of the General Laws, as amended by section 9 of chapter 50 of 
the Acts of 2023, is hereby amended by striking the figure "$3,000" and inserting in place 
thereof the following:- “fifteen thousand dollars ($15,000).”